Hawaii statutes.
[PART VIII.]
HEEIA COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT

[§206E-201] Definitions. As used in this part:

"District"
means the Heeia community development district.

"Fund"
means the Heeia community development revolving fund. [L 2011, c 210, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next